Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6033YH (3) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2149 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 8.85A Software licensing contracts. 1 The terms of a software licensing contract entered into by 2 the department or a supported entity for a software application 3 designed to be installed and run on generally available 4 desktop or server hardware shall not limit the ability of the 5 department or supported entity to install or run the software 6 application on the desktop or server hardware selected by the 7 department or supported entity. 8 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to software 9 licensing contracts and software licensing addendums entered 10 into or renewed by the department of management or a supported 11 entity, as defined in section 8.76, on or after the effective 12 date of this Act. 13